Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.073

Department of ecology—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of ecology to the director, his or her confidential secretary, his or her deputy director, and not to exceed six assistant directors.

[ 2012 c 117 s 8; 1970 ex.s. c 62 s 11.]

NOTES:

Savings—Severability—Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 62: See notes following RCW 43.21A.010.